California statutes. Education Code
(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall include input from relevant stakeholders, as determined by the Legislative Analyst’s Office.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 48.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.03.

(a) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall calculate a base entitlement for the transition to the local control funding formula for each school district and charter school equal to the sum of the amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive. The amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, shall be continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 14002.

(1) The current fiscal year base entitlement funding level shall be the sum of all of the following:

(A) For school districts, revenue limits in the 2012–13 fiscal year as computed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 42238), as that article read on
 January 1, 2013, divided by the 2012–13 average daily attendance of the school district computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. That quotient shall be multiplied by the current fiscal year average daily attendance of the school district computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. A school district’s 2012–13 fiscal year revenue limit funding shall exclude amounts computed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280). For purposes of this subparagraph, 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance and 2012–13 fiscal year revenue limits shall be considered final as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(B) (i) For charter schools, general purpose funding in the 2012–13 fiscal year as computed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 47633) of Chapter 6 of Part 26.8 of
 Division 4, as that article read on January 1, 2013, and the amount of in-lieu property tax provided to the charter school pursuant to Section 47635, as that section read on June 30, 2013, divided by the 2012–13 average daily attendance of the charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. That quotient shall be multiplied by the current fiscal year average daily attendance of the charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. For purposes of this subparagraph, 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance and 2012–13 fiscal year general purpose funding, as computed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 47633) of Chapter 6 of Part 26.8 of Division 4, as that article read on January 1, 2013, shall be considered final as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(ii) The amount
 computed pursuant to clause (i) shall exclude funds received by a charter school pursuant to Section 47634.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013.

(C) The amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall exclude funds received pursuant to Section 47633, as that section read on January 1, 2013.

(D) For school districts, funding for qualifying necessary small high schools and necessary small elementary schools shall be adjusted to reflect the funding levels that correspond to the 2012–13 necessary small high school and necessary small elementary school allowances pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) and former Section 42238.146, as those provisions read on January 1, 2013.

(2) (A) Entitlements from items contained in Section 2.00, as adjusted pursuant to Section 12.42, of
 the Budget Act of 2012 for Items 6110-104-0001, 6110-105-0001, 6110-108-0001, 6110-111-0001, 6110-124-0001, 6110-128-0001, 6110-137-0001, 6110-144-0001, 6110-156-0001, 6110-181-0001, 6110-188-0001, 6110-189-0001, 6110-190-0001, 6110-193-0001, 6110-195-0001, 6110-198-0001, 6110-204-0001, 6110-208-0001, 6110-209-0001, 6110-211-0001, 6110-212-0001, 6110-227-0001, 6110-228-0001, 6110-232-0001, 6110-240-0001, 6110-242-0001, 6110-243-0001, 6110-244-0001, 6110-245-0001, 6110-246-0001, 6110-247-0001, 6110-248-0001, 6110-260-0001, 6110-265-0001, 6110-267-0001, 6110-268-0001, and 6360-101-0001, 2012–13 fiscal year funding for the Class Size Reduction Program pursuant to former Chapter 6.10 (commencing with Section 52120) of Part 28 of Division 4, as it read on January 1, 2013, and 2012–13 fiscal year funding for pupils enrolled in community day schools who are mandatorily expelled pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915. The entitlement for basic aid school districts shall include the reduction of 8.92 percent as
 applied pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 89 of Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2012. For purposes of this subparagraph, 2012–13 fiscal year entitlements shall be considered final as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(B) Commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year, the entitlements identified in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted to reflect the exclusion of one-time redevelopment agency liquid asset recovery revenue, pursuant to Section 34179.5 and following, of the Health and Safety Code, before the application of the 8.92-percent reduction applied pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3 of Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2012.

(3) The allocations pursuant to
 Sections 42606 and 47634.1, as those sections read on January 1, 2013, divided by the 2012–13 average daily attendance of the charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. That quotient shall be multiplied by the current fiscal year average daily attendance of the charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05.

(4) The amount allocated to a school district or charter school pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) for the fiscal years before the current fiscal year divided by the average daily attendance of the school district or charter school for the fiscal years before the current fiscal year computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. That quotient shall be multiplied by the current fiscal year average daily attendance of the school district or charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. For purposes of this paragraph, the amount allocated pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) for the fiscal years before the
 current fiscal year, and the average daily attendance of the school district or charter school for the fiscal years before the current fiscal year, as computed pursuant to Section 42238.05, shall be considered final as of the third recertification of the annual apportionment.

(5) (A) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, a school district that, in the 2012–13 fiscal year, from any of the funding sources identified in paragraph (1) or (2), received funds on behalf of, or provided funds to, a regional occupational center or program joint powers agency established in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing instruction to secondary pupils shall not redirect that funding for another purpose unless otherwise authorized in law or pursuant to an agreement between the regional occupational center or program joint powers
 agency and the contracting school district.

(B) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, if a regional occupational center or program joint powers agency established in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing instruction to pupils enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, received, in the 2012–13 fiscal year, an apportionment of funds directly from any of the funding sources identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall apportion that same amount to the regional occupational center or program joint powers agency.

(6) (A) (i) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, a school district that, in the 2012–13 fiscal year, from any of the funding sources identified in paragraph (1) or
 (2), received funds on behalf of, or provided funds to, a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency established in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil transportation shall not redirect that funding for another purpose unless otherwise authorized in law or pursuant to an agreement between the home-to-school transportation joint powers agency and the contracting school district.

(ii) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, if a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency established in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil transportation received, in the 2012–13 fiscal year, an apportionment of funds directly from the Superintendent from any of the funding sources identified in subparagraph (A) of
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall apportion that same amount to the home-to-school transportation joint powers agency.

(iii) If a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil transportation, received an apportionment directly from the Superintendent from any of the funding sources specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) for the 2012–13 fiscal year, the joint powers agency may identify the member local educational agencies and transfer entitlement to that funding to any of those member local educational agencies by reporting to the Superintendent, on or before September 30, 2015, the reassignment of a specified amount of the joint powers agency’s 2012–13 fiscal year entitlement to the member local educational agency. Commencing with
 the 2015–16 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall add the reassigned amounts to the amounts calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(B) In addition to subparagraph (A), of the funds a school district receives for home-to-school transportation programs the school district shall expend, pursuant to former Article 2 (commencing with Section 39820) of Chapter 1 of Part 23.5, former Article 10 (commencing with Section 41850) of Chapter 5, and the Small School District Transportation program, as set forth in former Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 42290), as those articles read on January 1, 2013, no less for those programs than the amount of funds the school district expended for home-to-school transportation in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(7) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, of the funds a school district receives for purposes of
 regional occupational centers or programs, or adult education, the school district shall expend no less than the amount of funds the school district expended for purposes of regional occupational centers or programs, or adult education, respectively, in the 2012–13 fiscal year. For purposes of this paragraph, a school district may include expenditures made by its county office of education within the school district for purposes of regional occupational centers or programs so long as the total amount of expenditures by the school district and the county office of education equal or exceed the total amount required to be expended for purposes of regional occupational centers or programs pursuant to this paragraph and paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Section 2575.

(8) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, and for purposes of ensuring the continuity of essential induction and training services for beginning teachers, the Alameda County
 Superintendent of Schools shall withhold five hundred eighty-one thousand five hundred forty dollars ($581,540) from the local control funding formula apportionments of the Newark Unified School District, and from those withheld funds shall allocate the following amounts to the following entities:

(A) One hundred forty-seven thousand nine hundred twenty dollars ($147,920) to the Alameda Unified School District.

(B) One hundred four thousand dollars ($104,000) to the San Leandro Unified School District.

(C) One hundred sixty-four thousand six hundred twenty dollars ($164,620) to the Berkeley Unified School District.

(D) One hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($165,000) to the San Lorenzo Unified School District.

(b) Compute an annual local control funding formula transition adjustment for each school district and charter school as follows:

(1) Subtract the amount computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) from the amount computed for each school district or charter school under the local control funding formula entitlements computed pursuant to Section 42238.02. School districts and charter schools with a negative difference shall be deemed to have a zero difference.

(2) Each school district’s and charter school’s total need, as calculated pursuant to paragraph (1), shall be divided by the sum of all school districts’ and charter schools’ total need to determine the school district’s or charter school’s respective proportions of total need.

(3) (A) Each school district’s and charter school’s proportion of total need shall be multiplied by any available appropriations specifically made for purposes of this subdivision, and added to the school district’s or charter school’s funding amounts as calculated pursuant to subdivision (a).

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), the proportion of total need that is funded from any available appropriations specifically made for purposes of this subdivision for a fiscal year shall be considered fixed as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year. Adjustments to a school district’s or charter school’s total need, as computed pursuant to paragraph (1), subsequent to the second principal apportionment for a fiscal year, shall be funded based on the fixed proportion of total need that is funded for that fiscal year pursuant to this subdivision and shall
 be continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 14002.

(4) If the total amount of funds appropriated for purposes of paragraph (3) pursuant to this subdivision are sufficient to fully fund any positive amounts computed pursuant to paragraph (1), the local control funding formula grant computed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42238.02 shall be adjusted to ensure that any available appropriation authority is expended for purposes of the local control funding formula.

(c) The Superintendent shall subtract from the amounts computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) the sum of the following:

(1) (A) For school districts, the property tax revenue received pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue
 and Taxation Code.

(B) For charter schools, the in-lieu property tax amount provided to a charter school pursuant to Section 47635.

(2) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Part 18.5 (commencing with Section 38101) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16140) of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(4) Prior years’ taxes and taxes on the unsecured roll.

(5) Fifty percent of the amount received pursuant to Section 41603.

(6) The amount, if any, received pursuant to the Community Redevelopment Law (Part 1 (commencing
 with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code), less any amount received pursuant to Section 33401 or 33676 of the Health and Safety Code that is used for land acquisition, facility construction, reconstruction, or remodeling, or deferred maintenance and that is not an amount received pursuant to Section 33492.15, or paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 33607.5, or Section 33607.7 of the Health and Safety Code that is allocated exclusively for educational facilities.

(7) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Sections 34177, 34179.5, 34179.6, 34183, and 34188 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) Revenue received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(d) A school district or charter school that has a zero
 difference pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) in the prior fiscal year shall receive an entitlement equal to the amount calculated pursuant to Section 42238.02 in the current fiscal year and future fiscal years.

(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), or the computations pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, and Section 42238.02, commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a school district or charter school shall receive state-aid funding of no less than the sum of the amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(1) (A) For school districts, revenue limits in the 2012–13 fiscal year as computed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 42238), as that article read on January 1, 2013, divided by the 2012–13 average daily attendance of the school district computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. That
 quotient shall be multiplied by the current fiscal year average daily attendance of the school district computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. A school district’s 2012–13 revenue limit funding shall exclude amounts computed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280). For purposes of this subparagraph, 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance and 2012–13 fiscal year revenue limits shall be considered final as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(B) (i) For charter schools, general purpose funding in the 2012–13 fiscal year as computed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 47633) of Chapter 6 of Part 26.8 of Division 4, as that article read on January 1, 2013, and the amount of in-lieu property tax provided to the charter school in the 2012–13 fiscal year
 pursuant to Section 47635, as that section read on January 1, 2013, divided by the 2012–13 average daily attendance of the charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. That quotient shall be multiplied by the current fiscal year average daily attendance of the charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. For purposes of this subparagraph, 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance and 2012–13 fiscal year general purpose funding, as computed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 47633) of Chapter 6 of Part 26.8 of Division 4, as that article read on January 1, 2013, shall be considered final as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(ii) The amount computed pursuant to clause (i) shall exclude funds received by a charter school pursuant to Section 47634.1, as that section
 read on January 1, 2013.

(C) The amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall exclude funds received pursuant to Section 47633, as that section read on January 1, 2013.

(D) For school districts, the 2012–13 funding allowance provided for qualifying necessary small high schools and necessary small elementary schools pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) and Section 42238.146, as those provisions read on January 1, 2013.

(E) The amount computed pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, shall be reduced by the sum of the amount computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (c).

(2) (A) Entitlements from items contained in Section 2.00, as adjusted pursuant to Section 12.42, of the
 Budget Act of 2012 for Items 6110-104-0001, 6110-105-0001, 6110-108-0001, 6110-111-0001, 6110-124-0001, 6110-128-0001, 6110-137-0001, 6110-144-0001, 6110-156-0001, 6110-181-0001, 6110-188-0001, 6110-189-0001, 6110-190-0001, 6110-193-0001, 6110-195-0001, 6110-198-0001, 6110-204-0001, 6110-208-0001, 6110-209-0001, 6110-211-0001, 6110-212-0001, 6110-227-0001, 6110-228-0001, 6110-232-0001, 6110-240-0001, 6110-242-0001, 6110-243-0001, 6110-244-0001, 6110-245-0001, 6110-246-0001, 6110-247-0001, 6110-248-0001, 6110-260-0001, 6110-265-0001, 6110-267-0001, 6110-268-0001, and 6360-101-0001, 2012–13 fiscal year funding for the Class Size Reduction Program pursuant to former Chapter 6.10 (commencing with Section 52120) of Part 28 of Division 4, as it read on January 1, 2013, and 2012–13 fiscal year funding for pupils enrolled in community day schools who are mandatorily expelled pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915. The entitlement for basic aid school districts shall include the reduction of 8.92 percent as
 applied pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 89 of Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2012. For purposes of this subparagraph, 2012–13 fiscal year entitlements shall be considered final as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(B) Commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year, the entitlements identified in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted to reflect the exclusion of one-time redevelopment agency liquid asset recovery revenue, pursuant to Section 34179.5 and following, of the Health and Safety Code, before the application of the 8.92-percent reduction applied pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3 of Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2012.

(C) The Superintendent shall
 annually apportion any entitlement provided to the state special schools from the items specified in subparagraph (A) to the state special schools in the same amount as the state special schools received from those items in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(D) Commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, any portion of funding transferred to a school district or charter school by a joint powers agency pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be included in the entitlements specified in subparagraph (A) for the school district or charter school.

(3) The allocations pursuant to Sections 42606 and 47634.1, as those sections read on January 1, 2013, divided by the 2012–13 average daily attendance of the charter school. That quotient shall be multiplied by the current fiscal year average daily attendance of the charter school.

(4) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, funding for a restructured charter school shall be calculated as follows:

(i) Funding for a transferred charter school that meets the requirements of Section 47653 shall be calculated by doing both of the following:

(I) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (3), using the quotient calculated for the original charter school.

(II) For purposes of paragraph (2), using the same amount of entitlement funding calculated for the charter school before the restructuring.

(ii) (I) Funding for an acquiring charter school that meets the requirements of Section 47653 shall be calculated by doing both of the following:

(ia) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (3), using the median quotient calculated for the original charter schools.

(ib) For purposes of paragraph (2), using the same amount of entitlement funding calculated for each original charter school before the restructuring.

(II) This clause shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, unless its operation is extended by the Legislature.

(iii) Funding for a divided charter school that meets the requirements of Section 47653 shall be calculated by doing the following:

(I) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (3), using the quotients calculated for the original charter school for both the restructured portions of a divided charter school and the remaining
 portion of a divided charter school.

(II) For purposes of paragraph (2), dividing the amount between the restructured portions of a divided charter school and the remaining portion of a divided charter school based on each charter school’s share of the combined average daily attendance of the original charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05 as of the second principal apportionment in the fiscal year immediately before the first fiscal year of instruction as a restructured charter school. Data regarding average daily attendance shall be provided by the charter school in a format prescribed by the Superintendent. The total average daily attendance attributable to the restructured and remaining portions of a divided charter school shall not exceed the total average daily attendance of the original charter school for the applicable fiscal year. The amounts shall be final as of the second principal apportionment for the first fiscal
 year of instruction as a restructured charter school and each fiscal year thereafter.

(B) The definitions in Section 47654 apply for purposes of this paragraph.

(f) (1) For purposes of this section, commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year and until all school districts and charter schools equal or exceed their local control funding formula target computed pursuant to Section 42238.02, as determined by the calculation of a zero difference pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), a newly operational charter school shall be determined to have a prior year funding amount per unit of average daily attendance equal to the lesser of:

(A) The prior year funding amount per unit of average daily attendance for the school district in which the charter school is physically located. The Superintendent
 shall calculate the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance for this purpose by dividing the total local control funding formula entitlement, calculated pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), received by that school district in the prior year by prior year funded average daily attendance of that school district. For purposes of this subparagraph, a charter school that is physically located in more than one school district shall use the calculated local control funding entitlement per unit of average daily attendance of the school district with the highest prior year funding amount per unit of average daily attendance. For purposes of this subparagraph, the prior year funding amount per unit of average daily attendance for the school district in which the charter school is physically located shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment of the prior fiscal year.

(B) The charter school’s local control funding
 formula rate computed pursuant to subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive, of Section 42238.02.

(2) For charter schools funded pursuant to paragraph (1), the charter school shall be eligible to receive growth funding pursuant to subdivision (b) toward meeting the newly operational charter school’s local control funding formula target.

(3) Upon a determination that all school districts and charter schools equal or exceed the local control funding formula target computed pursuant to Section 42238.02, as determined by the calculation of a zero difference pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) for all school districts and charter schools, this subdivision shall not apply and the charter school shall receive an allocation equal to the amount calculated under Section 42238.02 in that fiscal year and future fiscal years.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the determination of a charter school’s physical location shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for the applicable fiscal year.

(g) (1) In each fiscal year the Superintendent shall determine the percentage of school districts that are apportioned funding pursuant to this section that is less than the amount computed pursuant to Section 42238.02 as of the second principal apportionments of the fiscal year. If the percentage is less than 10 percent, the Superintendent shall apportion funding to school districts and charter schools equal to the amount computed pursuant to Section 42238.02 in that fiscal year.

(2) For each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall apportion funding to a school district and charter school equal to the amount computed pursuant to Section
 42238.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 27.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.04.

Notwithstanding any other law, revenue limit funding for school districts and charter school block grant funding for charter schools for the 2012–13 fiscal year and prior fiscal years shall continue to be adjusted pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 42238), and Article 2 (commencing with Section 47633) of Chapter 6 of Part 26.8 of Division 4, as those articles read on January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 31.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.05.

(a) For purposes of Sections 42238.02, 42238.025, and 42238.03, the fiscal year average daily attendance for a school district shall be computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, as applicable.

(1) The second principal apportionment regular average daily attendance for the current fiscal year, or the prior fiscal year if the prior fiscal year total is greater, or the average of the three most recent prior fiscal years, if the three-year average total is greater than both the current fiscal year and prior fiscal year, excluding units of average daily attendance resulting from pupils attending schools funded pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280).

(2) The units of average
 daily attendance resulting from pupils attending schools funded pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280).

(3) Average daily attendance for any applicable prior fiscal year shall be adjusted for any loss or gain of average daily attendance due to a reorganization or transfer of territory.

(b) For purposes of this article, regular average daily attendance shall be the base grant average daily attendance.

(c) For purposes of this section, the Superintendent shall distribute total ungraded enrollment and average daily attendance among kindergarten and each of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in proportion to the amounts of graded enrollment and average daily attendance, respectively, in each of these grades.

(d) Subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive,
 shall only apply to average daily attendance generated by school districts and shall not apply to average daily attendance generated by charter schools.

(e) A pupil shall not be counted more than once for purposes of calculating average daily attendance pursuant to this section.

(f) For purposes of Sections 42238.02, 42238.025, and 42238.03, average daily attendance for a charter school shall be the total current year average daily attendance in the corresponding grade level ranges for the charter school.

(g) For purposes of computing the average of the three most recent prior fiscal years for a school district pursuant to this section, the Superintendent shall adjust a school district’s average daily attendance applicable to the 2021–22 fiscal year by the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a)
 of Section 42238.023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 21.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.051.

(a) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.05, a sponsoring school district’s average daily attendance shall be computed as follows:

(1) Compute the sponsoring school district’s regular average daily attendance in the current fiscal year, excluding the attendance of pupils in charter schools.

(2) (A) Compute the regular average daily attendance used to calculate the second principal apportionment of the school district for the three most recent
 prior
 fiscal years, excluding the attendance of pupils in charter schools.

(B) For the purpose of computing attendance for the three most recent prior fiscal years pursuant to subparagraph (A), the following adjustments shall be made:

(i) For a pupil attending a noncharter school of the school district between July 1, and the last day of the second attendance period, inclusive, in the current, prior, or second prior fiscal year, who attended a charter school sponsored by the school district in the respective prior fiscal year, the amount of second period
 attendance generated by that pupil at the charter school shall increase the sponsoring school district’s attendance for the respective prior fiscal year.

(ii) For a pupil attending a charter school between July 1, and the last day of the second attendance period, inclusive, in the current, prior, or second prior fiscal year, who attended a noncharter school of the sponsoring school district in the respective prior fiscal year, the amount of second period attendance generated by that pupil at the noncharter school of the school district shall decrease the sponsoring school district’s attendance for the respective prior fiscal year.

(iii) For purposes of clauses (i) and (ii), a pupil enrolled in a grade at a charter school sponsored by the school district shall not be counted if the school district does not offer classes for pupils enrolled in that grade for the respective prior
 fiscal year.

(iv) In each fiscal year, school districts shall report to the Superintendent the total prior year increase or decrease in second period attendance pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) at the first and second principal apportionments.

(v) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, an adjustment shall not be made to attendance in the second and third prior fiscal years.

(vi) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, an adjustment shall not be made to attendance in the third prior fiscal year.

(vii) Notwithstanding clauses (v) and (vi), if in any fiscal year the adjustments described in clauses (i) and (ii) result in a 50 percent or greater reduction of the school
 district’s second period attendance for the prior or second prior fiscal year, the school district’s average second period attendance for the three most recent prior fiscal years shall be zero.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “sponsoring school district” shall mean a “sponsoring local educational agency,” as defined in Section 47632, as that section read on January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 42.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.055.

(a) Sections 42238.051 and 42238.052 do not apply to resident pupils in charter schools operating under the districtwide charter of a school district that has converted all of its schools to charter status pursuant to Section 47606.

(b) For purposes of this section, “resident pupils” means pupils who reside in, and are otherwise eligible to attend, a school in the specified school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 33, Sec. 24.   (SB 859)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.06.

Commencing on July 1, 2013, except for Sections 42238, 42238.1, 42238.2, and 42238.5, or where the context requires otherwise, all of the following shall apply:

(a) References to “revenue limit” shall instead refer to the “local control funding formula.”

(b) References to “the revenue limit calculated pursuant to Section 42238” shall instead refer to “the local control funding formula calculated pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.”

(c) References to “Section 42238” shall instead refer to “Section 42238.02, as implemented pursuant to Section 42238.03.”

(d) References to “Section 42238.1” shall instead refer to “Section 42238.02.”

(e) References to “Section 42238.5” shall instead refer to “Section 42238.05.”

(f) References to “general-purpose entitlement” shall instead refer to “local control funding formula grant funding pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 36.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.07.

(a) On or before January 31, 2014, the state board shall adopt regulations that govern the expenditure of funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils pursuant to Sections 2574, 2575, 42238.02, and 42238.03. The regulations shall include, but are not limited to, provisions that do all of the following:

(1) Require a school district, county office of education, or charter school to increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils in the school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(2) Authorize a school district,
 county office of education, or charter school to use funds apportioned on the basis of the number of unduplicated pupils for schoolwide purposes, or, for school districts, districtwide purposes, for county offices of education, countywide purposes, or for charter schools, charterwide purposes, in a manner that is no more restrictive than the restrictions provided for in Title I of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301, et seq.).

(b) The state board may adopt emergency regulations for purposes of this section.

(c) Commencing with the local control and accountability plan and the annual update to the local control and accountability adopted on or before July 1, 2022, each school district, county office of education, and charter school shall do both of the following:

(1) Annually calculate the total difference between the total budgeted expenditures on planned actions reported in the local control and accountability plan pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 52064 and the total estimated actual expenditures for those actions reported in the local control and accountability plan pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 52064.

(2) If the total budgeted expenditures on planned actions reported in the local control and accountability plan pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 52064 is less than the estimate described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 52064, annually determine the total percentage point difference, if any, between the total planned quality improvements based on the
 planned specific actions reported in the local control and accountability plan pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 52064 and the total actual quality improvements for those actions reported in the local control and accountability plan pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 52064.
